Washington statutes.
RCW 36.100.140

Liability insurance.

The board of directors of the public facilities district may purchase liability insurance with such limits as the directors may deem reasonable for the purpose of protecting and holding personally harmless district officers and employees against liability for personal or bodily injuries and property damage arising from their acts or omissions while performing or in good faith purporting to perform their official duties.

[ 1995 c 396 s 11.]

NOTES:

Severability—1995 c 396: See note following RCW 36.100.010.